Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 7 Ignition Interlock Devices
42-8-116.
Warning labels.

The providers certified by the Department of Driver Services shall design and adopt pursuant to regulations of such department a warning label which shall be affixed to each ignition interlock device upon installation. The label shall contain a warning that any person tampering, circumventing, or otherwise misusing the device is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be subject to civil liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-7/HB 501; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-77/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “such department” for “the department” in the first sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-116.1.
Effect of failing to comply; previously installed devices.

Any other or former provision of this article notwithstanding:

The failure to install an ignition interlock device pursuant to an order of probation granted on or after May 1, 1999, but prior to May 1, 2000, shall not be ground for suspension or revocation of driving privileges, revocation of probation, refusal to issue a probationary driver’s license, or refusal to reinstate a driver’s license for the person granted such probation unless the order granting such probation unequivocally conditioned probation upon the installation of an ignition interlock device; and

In the case of any person who had installed and maintained an ignition interlock device in a motor vehicle for a period of six months pursuant to any order of probation granted on or after May 1, 1999, but prior to May 1, 2000, any lack of certification of such ignition interlock device or of the provider center for such device or lack of a limited driving permit for the period of use of such device shall not be ground for suspension or revocation of driving privileges, revocation of probation, refusal to issue a probationary driver’s license, or refusal to reinstate a driver’s license for the person subject to such order if such installation and the monitoring required by this article for the required period of maintenance is confirmed in writing by the provider center for such device.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-116.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 42.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000 and in 2001, “May 1, 2000” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in paragraphs (1) and (2).

42-8-117.
Revocation of driving privilege upon violation of probation imposed by Code Section 42-8-111.

In the event the sentencing court revokes a person’s probation after finding that such person has violated the terms of the certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111, the Department of Driver Services shall revoke that person’s driving privilege for one year from the date the court revokes that person’s probation. The court shall report such probation revocation to the Department of Driver Services by court order.

This subsection shall not apply to any person whose limited driving permit has been revoked under subsection (d) of Code Section 42-8-112.

In the event the sentencing court revokes a person’s probation after finding that such person has twice violated the terms of the certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 during the same period of probation, the Department of Driver Services shall revoke that person’s driving privilege for five years from the date the court revokes that person’s probation for a second time. The court shall report such probation revocation to the Department of Driver Services by court order.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-117

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2004, p. 604, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-8/HB 501; Ga. L. 2012, p. 72, § 9/SB 236.

The 2012 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1) and the first sentence of subsection (b), substituted “revokes a person’s probation after finding that such person” for “finds that a person” and substituted “the certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license issued” for “probation imposed”.

42-8-118.
Requesting or soliciting another to blow into device; tampering with or circumventing operation of device.

It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 to request or solicit any other person to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing the person so restricted with an operable motor vehicle.

It is unlawful for any person to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111.

It is unlawful to tamper with, or circumvent the operation of, an ignition interlock device.

Any person violating any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-118

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6.